Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. License Duration, Renewal, Inactivity, and Surrender.

Sec. 06.60.080.
Duration of license.

Except for a provisional license issued under AS

06.60.077

, a license issued under this chapter remains in effect until December 31 of the year in which the license is issued, unless the license is revoked, is suspended, is surrendered, or becomes inactive under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 20 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.085.
Renewal of license.

If a licensee intends to renew a license, the licensee shall submit to the department

a renewal application at a time and in the form and manner established by the department and the registry;

the annual license fee;

if the renewal is for a mortgage license,

a report, as required by regulation, identifying any changes in the information provided to the department; and

current information indicating that the mortgage licensee continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance;

if the renewal is for a mortgage loan originator license,

a report, as required by regulation, identifying any changes in the information provided to the department;

current information indicating that the mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance;

certificates or other documents showing the mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements of AS

06.60.160

; and

the fund fee required by AS

06.60.550

; and

payment of any other required fees for renewal of the license.

The department may adopt by regulation procedures and deadlines regarding the filing of an application for renewal of a license and the assessment of a penalty or other consequence for late filing, consistent with the requirements of the registry.

The department shall approve or deny the application for renewal of a license not later than 60 days after the renewal application is filed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 21 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

For license duration, renewal, inactivity, and surrender, see 3 AAC 14, art. 4.

Sec. 06.60.087.
Standards for license renewal.

After a licensee complies with AS

06.60.085

, the department may renew the licensee’s license if

the licensee continues to meet the standards for license issuance under AS

06.60.060

;

in the case of a mortgage loan originator license, the mortgage loan originator licensee has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements of AS

06.60.160

;

the licensee has paid all required fees for renewal of the license; and

the licensee is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted and orders issued under this chapter.

If a licensee fails to satisfy (a) of this section, the license expires at the end of the period for which the license was issued. The department may adopt by regulation procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses. The procedures must be consistent with the standards established by the registry.

History.

(§ 22 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.090.
Inactive license.

A license may become inactive under this section.

To be eligible to have a mortgage license become inactive, all mortgage loans of a licensee must have been paid in full or sold.

For a license to become inactive, a licensee shall provide the department with a written request that the license become inactive. The request must include the licensee’s name, the licensee’s address, and other information the department requires to process the request. If the request is made by mortgage licensee, the request must include a statement by the mortgage licensee that all mortgage loans of the mortgage licensee have been paid in full or sold.

The department shall issue an inactive license certificate to a person whose license becomes inactive under this section.

If a person holds a license that becomes inactive under this section, the person may not operate as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator under the license in this state until the license is reactivated.

If a license becomes inactive under this section, the license remains inactive until the license expires, the person surrenders the license, or the department approves the reactivation of the license, whichever event occurs first. The licensee’s request for reactivation must include the information that the department requires to process the request.

While a license is inactive under this section, the person holding the inactive license shall

pay the annual license fee as required by AS

06.60.035

;

inform the department of any change that occurs in the name and address of the person, the location of the person’s business, or the business operations or control of the person;

maintain the bond required by AS

06.60.045

; and

file the annual report required by AS

06.60.100(a)

.

Notwithstanding AS

06.60.120

, while a license is inactive under this section, the person who holds the license may not transfer the license to another person.

[Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

While a license is inactive under this section, the person holding the inactive license shall continue to maintain records as required by AS

06.60.135

for the business transactions of the person that occurred before the license became inactive.

While a license is inactive under this section, the department may take action against the license, the person holding the inactive license, or both for noncompliance with this chapter before the license became inactive or for noncompliance with this section while the license is inactive.

A licensee whose license lapses under this chapter is not eligible for an inactive license under this section unless the license is reactivated under AS

06.60.095

.

A person holding a license that is inactive under this section may not engage in activities for which the license is required, but may receive commissions or other payments from a person who contracted with or employed the licensee for services, if the services were performed while the licensee was actively licensed.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and by regulations adopted by the department, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to a person holding an inactive license under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 23 — 26, 87 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For license duration, renewal, inactivity, and surrender, see 3 AAC 14, art. 4.

Sec. 06.60.095.
Reactivation of inactive license.

A person who has an inactive license certificate under AS

06.60.090

may apply to the department for an active license and pay the required fees. To be eligible for license reactivation, the applicant shall comply with all requirements for licensure in effect at the time of reactivation.

If the department reactivates a license under this section, the license expires on December 31 of the year in which it is issued.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 27 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.097.
Surrender of license.

A licensee may surrender a license issued to the licensee by delivering written notice to the department that the licensee intends to surrender the license, except that a mortgage licensee may not surrender a license until all loans of that mortgage licensee have either been paid in full or sold.

[Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Surrender of a license under this section does not affect the licensee’s civil or criminal liability for acts committed before surrender of the license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For license duration, renewal, inactivity, and surrender, see 3 AAC 14, art. 4.

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.